en: Rice pasta
bg: Оризова паста
de: Reispasta
es: Pastas de arroz
fi: Riisipasta
fr: Pâtes de riz, Pâte de riz
hr: Tjestenina od riže
it: Pasta di riso
nl: Rijstpastas

en: Cooked unsalted rice noodles
fr: Vermicelles de riz cuits non salés

en: Fried unsalted rice noodles
fr: Nouilles de riz sautées non salées

en: Dried rice noodles
bg: Сушени оризови локши
ca: Fideus de riu secs
da: Tørrede risnudler
de: Trockene Reisnudeln
es: Fideos de arroz deshidratados
fi: Kuivat riisinuudelit
fr: Vermicelles de riz secs
he: אטריות אורז יבשות
hr: Sušeni rižini rezanci
it: Vermicelli di riso secchi
ja: 乾燥した米の麺
nl: Droge rijstnoedels
pl: Suszone makaroniki ryżowe
ru: Сушеные рисовые лапши
sv: Torkade risnudlar
zh: 干米面条

en: Sautéed noodles with shrimps, Pan-fried noodles with shrimps
fr: Nouilles sautées aux crevettes, Nouilles poêlées aux crevettes

en: Chinese noodles
de: Chinesische Nudeln
es: Fideos chinos, Noodles chinos
fi: kiinalaiset nuudelit
fr: Nouilles chinoises
hr: Kineski rezanci
it: Noodle cinesi
nl: Chinese noedels, Woknoedels
pl: Makaron chiński
zh: 中式面条, 中国面条

en: Chinese egg noodles
de: chinesische Eiernudeln
fr: Nouilles chinoises aux oeufs
hr: Kineski rezanci s jajima
it: Noodle all'uovo cinesi
nl: Chinese eiernoedels
zh: 中式鸡蛋面

en: Flavoured cooked Asian noodles, Flavoured chinese noodles
fr: Nouilles asiatiques cuites aromatisées, Nouilles asiatiques aromatisées

en: Cooked unsalted plain Asian noodles, plain Asian noodles
fr: Nouilles asiatiques cuites nature non salées, Nouilles asiatiques nature

en: Flavoured dehydrated Asian noodles
fr: Nouilles asiatiques aromatisées déshydratées

en: Instant noodles
de: Instant-Nudeln
es: Fideos instantáneos, Noodles instantáneos
fi: pikanuudelit
fr: Nouilles instantanées
hr: Instant rezanci
it: Noodle istantanei
ja: 即席麺
nl: Instantnoedels
pl: Makarony instant
pt: Macarrão Instantâneo
ru: Лапша быстрого приготовления, быстрая лапша
sv: Snabbnudlar
zh: 方便面, 速食面条

en: Instant noodle soups
de: Instant Nudelsuppen
es: Sopas de fideos instantáneas
fi: kiirnuudlisupid
fr: Soupes de nouilles instantanées, Soupe de nouilles instantanée, Soupe de nouilles instantanées
hr: Instant juhe s rezancima
nl: Instantnoedelsoepen
pl: Zupy z makaronem instant
ru: Супы быстрого приготовления
zh: 方便面汤, 速食面汤

en: Dehydrated Asian-style soup with noodles
fr: Soupes de pâtes asiatique déshydratée

en: Whole Wheat Noodles
de: Vollkornnudeln
fi: Täysjyvävehnänuudelit
fr: Nouilles de blé complet, nouilles au blé complet
hr: Rezanci od cjelovitog zrna pšenice
it: Noodle di Grano
nl: Volkorennoedels

en: Soy vermicelli, soy noodles
de: Soja-Vermicelli
es: Fideos de soja
fr: Vermicelles de soja
hr: Vermicelli od soje
it: Vermicelli di soia
ja: 大豆のビーフン、大豆の麺
nl: Soja vermicelli, soja noedels
pl: Makaron sojowy
pt: Vermicelli de soja, Noodles de soja
ru: Соевые вермишель, соевая лапша
sv: Sojaverimicelli, sojanudlar
zh: 豆腐粉丝, 豆腐面条

en: Unsalted cooked soy noodles
de: Ungesalzene gekochte Soja-Nudeln
es: Fideos de soja cocidos sin sal
fr: Vermicelles de soja cuites non salées
hr: Neslani kuhani sojini rezanci
it: Vermicelli di soia cotti non salati
ja: 塩抜きした大豆のビーフン
nl: Ongezouten gekookte soja vermicelli
pl: Nieosolone gotowane makaronowe z soi
pt: Macarrão de soja cozido sem sal
ru: Несоленые вареные соевые лапша
sv: Osaltade kokta sojanudlar
zh: 无盐煮熟的豆腐面条

en: Dried soy vermicelli, Dried soy noodles
de: Getrocknete Soja-Vermicelli, Getrocknete Soja-Nudeln
es: Fideos de soja secos
fr: Vermicelles de soja sèches
hr: Sušeni vermicelli od soje
it: Vermicelli di soia essiccati, Noodles di soia essiccati
ja: 乾燥した大豆のビーフン、乾燥した大豆の麺
nl: Gedroogde soja vermicelli, Gedroogde soja noedels
pl: Suche makaronowe z soi
pt: Vermicelli de soja seco, Noodles de soja seco
ru: Сушеные соевые вермишель, Сушеные соевые лапша
sv: Torkade sojaverimicelli, Torkade sojanudlar
zh: 干豆腐粉丝, 干豆腐面条

en: Korean noodles, Guksu
fr: Nouilles coréennes, Guksu

en: Pasta dishes, Meals with pasta
ca: Plats de pasta
de: Nudelgerichte, Nudelgericht
es: Platos de pasta
fi: pasta-ateriat
fr: Plats à base de pâtes, plats préparés à base de pâtes, plats aux pâtes, Pâtes préparées
he: מנות פסטה
hr: Jela od tjestenine
hu: Tésztaételek
it: Piatti a base di pasta
ja: パスタ料理
nl: Pastaschotels, Pastaschotel, Kant-en-klaar pastamaaltijden
pl: Dania z makaronem
pt: Pratos de massa
ru: Блюда из макарон
sv: Pastarätter
zh: 意大利面料理

en: Frozen pasta dishes, Frozen meals with pasta
sv: Frysta pastarätter